src/scripts/Czech/stress.foma
define UnstressedVowelPhonem [a | aa | e | ee | ije | i | ii | o | oo | u | uu | ou | y | yy ] ;

define setStress [a:a1|
aa:aa1|
e:e1|
ee:ee1|
ije:ije1|
i:i1|
ii:ii1|
o:o1|
oo:oo1|
u:u1|
uu:uu1|
ou:ou1|
y:y1|
yy:yy1
iii:iii1
ax:ax1
];

define procStressG2p setStress @-> ||
_ \UnstressedVowelPhonem+ UnstressedVowelPhonem+ .#.,
_ \UnstressedVowelPhonem+ UnstressedVowelPhonem+ \UnstressedVowelPhonem+ .#.,
.#. \UnstressedVowelPhonem+ _ \UnstressedVowelPhonem+ .#.;

define procStressLseq setStress @-> ||
_ \UnstressedVowelPhonem+ .#.,
_  .#.;


define procStress2 [a:a0|
aa:aa0|
e:e0|
ee:ee0|
ije:ije0|
i:i0|
o:o0|
oo:oo0|
u:u0|
uu:uu0|
ou:ou0|
y:y0|
yy:yy0
iii:iii0
ax:ax0
] @-> || _ ;
